North Carolina, session 2025, HB496.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-206 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-206. State Board of Education; duties; responsibilities.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare and present to the State Board of
Education recommendations for general guidelines for encouraging increased community
involvement in the public schools and use of public school facilities. These recommendations
shall include, but shall not be limited to provisions for:
…
(4) Local boards of education are to be directed to give priority in the use of
school facilities to Requiring public school units to permit any youth group
listed in Title 36 of the United States Code as a patriotic society, such as the
Boy Scouts of America, and its affiliated North Carolina groups and councils,
and the Girl Scouts of the United States of America, and its affiliated North
Carolina groups and councils, in order to encourage schools to facilitate access
for students to participate in activities provided by these groups at times other
than instructional time during the school day for the purposes of encouraging
civic education.the opportunity to give a presentation on the purpose of the
group, how to become a member of the group, and encouraging civic
education. Presentations given pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed
10 minutes and shall be scheduled between the start and release times of the
instructional day. Presentation time does not count toward any instructional
hour requirements. Nothing in this section, or a policy or rule adopted
pursuant to this section, shall be construed as requiring a public school unit to
provide equal access to an organization that is not designated as a patriotic
organization.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-150.12C(28) reads as rewritten:
"(28) Access for youth groups. – Schools for the deaf and blind are encouraged to
facilitate access for students to participate in activities provided by any youth
group listed in Title 36 of the United States Code as a patriotic society, such
as the Boy Scouts of America, and its affiliated North Carolina groups and
councils, and the Girl Scouts of the United States of America, and its affiliated
North Carolina groups and councils. Student participation in any activities
*H496-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
offered by these organizations shall not interfere with instructional time
during the school day for the purposes of encouraging civic education.shall
develop policies to ensure that patriotic youth groups have access to schools
in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 115C-206(4)."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-207 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-207. Authority and responsibility of local boards of education.
Every local board of education that uses State funds to implement programs under this Article
shall:
…
(4) Give priority in the use of school facilities to any youth group listed in Title
36 of the United States Code as a patriotic society, such as the Boy Scouts of
America, and its affiliated North Carolina groups and councils, and the Girl
Scouts of the United States of America, and its affiliated North Carolina
groups and councils, in order to encourage schools to facilitate access for
students to participate in activities provided by these groups at times other
than instructional time during the school day for the purposes of encouraging
civic education. If the local board of education denies priority access to a
patriotic society listed in Title 36 of the United States Code, the local board
shall provide reasons for the denial in writing to the requesting entity.Develop
policies to ensure that patriotic youth groups have access to schools in
accordance with the provisions of G.S. 115C-206(4).
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Access for Youth Groups. – Charter schools are encouraged to facilitate access for
students to participate in activities provided by any youth group listed in Title 36 of the United
States Code as a patriotic society, such as the Boy Scouts of America, and its affiliated North
Carolina groups and councils, and the Girl Scouts of the United States of America, and its
affiliated North Carolina groups and councils. Student participation in any activities offered by
these organizations shall not interfere with instructional time during the school day for the
purposes of encouraging civic education.Charter schools shall develop policies to ensure that
patriotic youth groups have access to schools in accordance with the provisions of
G.S. 115C-206(4)."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66(13) reads as rewritten:
"(13) Access for youth groups. – Regional schools are encouraged to facilitate
access for students to participate in activities provided by any youth group
listed in Title 36 of the United States Code as a patriotic society, such as the
Boy Scouts of America, and its affiliated North Carolina groups and councils,
and the Girl Scouts of the United States of America, and its affiliated North
Carolina groups and councils. Student participation in any activities offered
by these organizations shall not interfere with instructional time during the
school day for the purposes of encouraging civic education.Regional schools
shall develop policies to ensure that patriotic youth groups have access to
schools in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 115C-206(4)."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 496-Second Edition